Utah statutes.
16-16-120.   Service of process.

(1)  An agent for service of process appointed by a limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative is an agent of the association or foreign cooperative for service of process, notice, or a demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the association or foreign cooperative.

(2)  If a limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative does not appoint or maintain an agent for service of process in this state or the agent for service of process cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the address of the designated office on file with the division, the division is an agent of the association or foreign cooperative upon which process, notice, or a demand may be served.

(3)  Service of process, notice, or a demand on the division as agent of a limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative may be made by delivering to the division two copies of the process, notice, or demand.  The division shall forward one copy by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the association or foreign cooperative at its principal office.

(4)  Service is effected under Subsection (3) on the earliest of:

(a)  the date the limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative receives the process, notice, or demand;

(b)  the date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the association or foreign cooperative; or

(c)  five days after the process, notice, or demand is deposited by the division for delivery by the United States Postal Service, if mailed postage prepaid to the address of the principal office on file with the division.

(5)  The division shall keep a record of each process, notice, and demand served pursuant to this section and record the time of, and the action taken regarding, the service.

(6)  This section does not affect the right to serve process, notice, or a demand in any other manner provided by law.

